Connecticut, session 2026, SB00248.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Office of Legislative
2 Management shall conduct a study regarding the feasibility of
3 reestablishing the duties, responsibilities and staffing of the former
4 Legislative Program Review and Investigations Committee within the
5 joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
6 matters relating to government oversight, including, but not limited to,
7 what additional staffing it would require, what costs would be
8 associated with providing additional resources for the committee and
9 any potential benefits of such reestablishment. Not later than January 1,
10 2027, the executive director of the Office of Legislative Management
11 shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
12 of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
13 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to government
14 oversight. Such report shall include any findings of such study and any
SB248 / File No. 288 1

SB248 File No. 288
15 recommendations for legislation to implement such findings.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GOS Joint Favorable
SB248 / File No. 288 2

SB248 File No. 288
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Office of Legislative Management (OLM) to
study the feasibility of reestablishing the Legislative Program Review
and Investigations Committee resulting in no fiscal impact to the state
as OLM has the resources and expertise to meet the requirements of the
study.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB248 / File No. 288 3

SB248 File No. 288
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 248
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF REESTABLISHING THE
DUTIES, RESPONSIBILITIES AND STAFFING OF THE
LEGISLATIVE PROGRAM REVIEW AND INVESTIGATIONS
COMMITTEE.